Florida, session 2026, SB7032.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 33 34 Section 1.âSection 287.15, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 35 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 287.151, Florida 36 Statutes, is amended to read: 37 287.151âLimitation on classes of motor vehicles procured.â 38 (2)âNo Funds in the General Appropriations Act may not 39 shall be used to purchase any vehicle at prices in excess of the 40 standard prices negotiated by the Department of Management 41 Services. State agencies may purchase vehicles from nonstate 42 term contract vendors if the cost of the motor vehicle is equal 43 to or less than the cost of a similar class of vehicle found on 44 a state term contact. 45 Section 3.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 287.155, 46 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 47 287.155âMotor vehicles; purchase by Department of Children 48 and Families, Agency for Persons with Disabilities, Department 49 of Health, Department of Juvenile Justice, and Department of 50 Corrections.â 51 (1)âThe Department of Children and Families, the Agency for 52 Persons with Disabilities, the Department of Health, the 53 Department of Juvenile Justice, and the Department of 54 Corrections may, subject to the approval of the Department of 55 Management Services, purchase automobiles, trucks, tractors, and 56 other automotive equipment for the use of institutions or 57 developmental disabilities centers under the management of the 58 Department of Children and Families, the Agency for Persons with 59 Disabilities, the Department of Health, and the Department of 60 Corrections, and for the use of residential facilities managed 61 or contracted by the Department of Juvenile Justice. 62 (3)âThe Department of Health is authorized, subject to the 63 approval of the Department of Management Services, to purchase 64 automobiles, trucks, and other automotive equipment for use by 65 county health departments. 66 Section 4.âSection 287.156, Florida Statutes, is created to 67 read: 68 287.156âPowers and duties of state agencies.âState agencies 69 shall have all of the following powers, duties, and 70 responsibilities: 71 (1)âTo purchase, lease, acquire, or dispose of a motor 72 vehicle, a watercraft, or an aircraft. 73 (2)âTo establish and operate facilities for the 74 acquisition, disposal, operation, maintenance, repair, storage, 75 supervision, control, and regulation of motor vehicles, 76 watercraft, and aircraft and to operate facilities for those 77 purposes. An agency may contract for the maintenance of its 78 motor vehicles. 79 (3)âTo maintain records and make quarterly reports to the 80 Department of Management Services regarding motor vehicles and 81 aircraft owned or leased by the agency, including all of the 82 following: 83 (a)âThe number of motor vehicles and aircraft, including a 84 unique entry for each motor vehicle or aircraft which details 85 its make, model, year, and vehicle identification number or tail 86 number. 87 (b)âThe disposal of motor vehicles and aircraft, associated 88 costs and proceeds, and the reason for the disposal. 89 (c)âThe use of motor vehicles and aircraft, including total 90 mileage or hours flown. 91 (d)âThe fuel usage and costs related to the motor vehicles 92 and aircraft. 93 (e)âThe maintenance operations and costs related to the 94 motor vehicles and aircraft, including, if apparent, the reason 95 for needed maintenance. 96 (f)âAny planned upgrade or replacement of motor vehicles or 97 aircraft, and an estimate of associated costs. 98 Section 5.âSubsections (2), (3), and (8) of section 287.16, 99 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 100 287.16âPowers and duties of department.âThe Department of 101 Management Services shall have the following powers, duties, and 102 responsibilities: 103 (2)âTo establish and operate central facilities for the 104 acquisition, disposal, operation, maintenance, repair, storage, 105 supervision, control, and regulation of all state-owned or 106 state-leased aircraft, watercraft, and motor vehicles and to 107 operate any state facilities for those purposes. Acquisition may 108 be by purchase, lease, loan, or in any other legal manner. The 109 department may contract for the maintenance of motor vehicles. 110 (3)âIn its discretion, to require every state agency to 111 transfer its ownership, custody, and control of every aircraft 112 and motor vehicle, and associated maintenance facilities and 113 equipment, except those used principally for law enforcement, 114 state fire marshal, or fire control purposes, to the Department 115 of Management Services, including all right, title, interest, 116 and equity therein. 117 (7)(8)âTo require any state agency to submit keep records 118 and make reports regarding aircraft and motor vehicles to the 119 department as may be required. The department shall compile the 120 state agency reports quarterly and provide such reports to 121 legislative appropriation committees Department of Highway 122 Safety and Motor Vehicles shall use a reporting system approved 123 by the department. 124 Section 6.âSection 287.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to 125 read: 126 287.18âRepair and service of motor vehicles and aircraft. 127 The Secretary of Management Services or his or her designee may 128 request require a department or any state agency having 129 facilities for the repair of aircraft or motor vehicles and for 130 the storage and distribution of gasoline and other petroleum 131 products to repair aircraft and motor vehicles and to furnish 132 gasoline and other petroleum products to any other department or 133 agency and shall compensate for the cost of such services and 134 products. 135 Section 7.âSection 287.19, Florida Statutes, is amended to 136 read: 137 287.19âTransfer of funds.âAll Moneys designated for or 138 appropriated to any agency for the use, operation, maintenance, 139 repair, or replacement of any state-owned or leased motor 140 vehicles or aircraft must shall be transferred to the Department 141 of Management Services upon services rendered as required by the 142 department. 143 Section 8.âSubsection (4) of section 273.055, Florida 144 Statutes, is amended to read: 145 273.055âDisposition of state-owned tangible personal 146 property.â 147 (4)âEach custodian shall adopt guidelines or administrative 148 rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 120 providing for, but 149 not limited to, transferring, warehousing, bidding, destroying, 150 scrapping, or other disposing of state-owned tangible personal 151 property. However, the approval of the Department of Management 152 Services is required prior to the disposal of motor vehicles, 153 watercraft, or aircraft pursuant to ss. 287.15 and 287.16. 154 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.